Utah statutes.
54-10a-303.   Representation of municipal electrical energy utility prohibited.

The office, director, or committee may not represent, assist, or be an advocate on behalf of a municipality, as defined in Section 10-1-104, that generates, transmits, or distributes electrical energy.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 237, 2009 General Session

